Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3005
Employer; submit description of training
program.

(1)
To be eligible to file an application for an agreement with the director under
the Teleworker Job Creation Act, the employer shall submit a description of
its training program to the director for review.

(2) If the employer's
training program meets the requirements to constitute a qualified training
program under the act, the director shall approve such program and provide
the employer with an approval letter.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 5.